Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Voting Trusts and Shareholders' Agreements

48-17-301. Voting trusts.

One (1) or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by signing an agreement setting out the provisions of the trust (which may include anything consistent with its purpose) and transferring their shares to the trustee. When a voting trust agreement is signed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all owners of beneficial interests in the trust, together with the number and class of shares each transferred to the trust, and deliver copies of the list and agreement to the corporation's principal office.

A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to the trust are registered in the trustee's name. A voting trust is valid for not more than ten (10) years after its effective date unless extended under subsection (c).

All or some of the parties to a voting trust may extend it for additional terms of not more than ten (10) years each by signing an extension agreement and obtaining the voting trustee's written consent to the extension. An extension is valid for ten (10) years from the date the first shareholder signs the extension agreement. The voting trustee shall deliver copies of the extension agreement and list of beneficial owners to the corporation's principal office. An extension agreement binds only those parties signing it.

The trustee or trustees of the voting trust may execute and deliver to the transferring shareholders voting trust certificates evidencing the interest of such transferring shareholder in the shares transferred in trust, and such voting trust certificates shall be transferable in the same manner and with the same effect as certificates representing shares under chapter 16 of this title.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.30.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1116.

48-17-302. Shareholders' agreements.

An agreement between two (2) or more shareholders, if in writing and signed by the parties thereto, may provide that, in exercising any voting rights, the shares held by them shall be voted as therein provided, or as they may agree, or as determined in accordance with a procedure agreed upon by them. Nothing in this subsection (a) shall impair the right of the corporation to treat the shareholders of record as entitled to vote the shares standing in their names. A voting agreement created under this section is not subject to § 48-17-301 and may be specifically enforced.

No written agreement to which all or less than all the shareholders have actually assented, whether embodied in the charter or bylaws or in any agreement in writing signed by all the parties thereto, which agreement relates to any phase of the affairs of the corporation, whether to the management of its business or to the division of its profits or otherwise, shall be invalid as between the parties thereto on the ground that it is an attempt by the parties thereto to restrict the discretion of the board of directors in its management of the business of the corporation or to treat the corporation as if it were a partnership or to arrange their relationships in a manner that would be appropriate only between partners.

A transferee of shares in a corporation whose shareholders have entered into an agreement authorized by subsection (a) or (b) shall be bound by such agreement if the transferee takes the shares with notice thereof. A transferee shall be deemed to have notice of any such agreement or any such renewal if the existence thereof is noted on the face or back of the certificate or certificates representing such shares.

The effect of any agreement authorized by subsection (b) shall be to relieve the directors and impose upon the shareholders assenting thereto the liability for managerial acts or omissions that is imposed on directors by law, to the extent that and so long as the discretion or powers of the board of directors, in its management of corporate affairs, are controlled by any such agreement.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.31; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 29, 30.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1116.